Delaware, session 153, HB249.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary: (1) For purposes of this section: a. âNew constructionâ means real property where the completion of a building during the 2024-2025 tax year required the supplemental assessment of the property and corresponding update to the county assessment rolls. b. âPreviously assessed valueâ means the assessed value of real property used for the 2024-2025 tax year. (2)a. Each school district shall issue a new tax collection warrant to the county for the 2025-2026 tax year using the previously assessed value of all real property subject to the local school tax levied under Chapter 19 of Title 14 of the Delaware Code. b. The school district must deliver the tax collection warrant issued under paragraph (2)a. of this section to the county no later than 10 business days after [the effective date of this Act]. (3)a. Upon receipt of the tax collection warrant required under paragraph (2) of this section, the county shall void all tax bills already issued to taxpayers in the county for tax year 2025-2026 and reissue tax bills for tax year 2025-2026 that total the sum of all of the following: 1. The amount of property tax due on property subject to county taxation under Part V of Title 9 of the Delaware Code, calculated using the previously assessed value of the real property. 2. The amount of the local school tax due under the tax collection warrant issued under paragraph (2) of this section. b. Paragraph (3)a. of this section does not apply to tax bills for new construction. (4)a. The deadline for payment of the tax bills reissued under paragraph (3)a. of this section, including any balance due because the taxpayerâs tax bill is higher after adjustment under this section, is extended to October 30, 2025. b. Interest and penalties for unpaid taxes due under this section may not be charged until after October 30, 2025. (5) A county shall refund or credit any overpayment of taxes for the 2025-2026 tax year to each taxpayer who pays the amount due under a tax bill that is subsequently adjusted under this section. (6) A school district may request and borrow from State Division I funds in the event of a cash flow shortfall of local school funds due to the extension of the deadline for tax payments for the 2026 fiscal year.